pl: Technologia synchronizacji adaptacyjnej: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; Brak; VESA Adaptive Sync; Inne
zh-TW: 自適應同步技術: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; 無; VESA Adaptive Sync; 其他
ru: Технология адаптивной синхронизации: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; Нет; VESA Adaptive Sync; Другой
es: Tecnología de sincronización adaptativa: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; Compatible con NVIDIA G-Sync; Ninguno; VESA Adaptive Sync; Otros
hu: Adaptív szinkronizálási technológia: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync kompatibilis; Egyik sem; VESA adaptív szinkronizáció; Egyéb
vi: Công nghệ đồng bộ thích ứng: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; Tương thích NVIDIA G-Sync; Không có; VESA Adaptive Sync; Khác
cs: Technologie adaptivní synchronizace: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync kompatibilní; Žádný; VESA adaptivní synchronizace; Jiné
sv: Adaptiv synkroniseringsteknik: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync-kompatibel; Inga; VESA Adaptive Sync; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tecnologia de sincronização adaptativa: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; Compatível com NVIDIA G-Sync; Nenhum; VESA Adaptive Sync; Outro
ro-RO: Tehnologie de sincronizare adaptivă: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; Compatibil NVIDIA G-Sync; Niciuna; VESA Adaptive Sync; Altele
sl-SI: Tehnologija prilagodljive sinhronizacije: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync združljivo; Brez; VESA Adaptive Sync; Drugo
bg-BG: Технология за адаптивна синхронизация: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync съвместим; Няма; VESA адаптивна синхронизация; Други
hr-HR: Tehnologija prilagodljive sinkronizacije: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync kompatibilno; Nema; VESA Adaptive Sync; Ostalo
ko: 적응형 동기화 기술: AMD FreeSync; AMD 프리싱크 프리미엄; AMD 프리싱크 프리미엄 프로; NVIDIA G-싱크; NVIDIA G-싱크 호환; 없음; VESA 어댑티브 싱크; 기타
fi: Mukautuva synkronointitekniikka: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync -yhteensopiva; Ei mitään; VESA Adaptive Sync; Muu
lt-LT: Adaptyvaus sinchronizavimo technologija: „AMD FreeSync“; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync suderinama; Nėra; VESA adaptyvus sinchronizavimas; Kita
pt-BR: Tecnologia de sincronização adaptativa: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync compatível; Nenhum; VESA Adaptive Sync; Outro
nb: Adaptiv synkroniseringsteknologi: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync-kompatibel; Ingen; VESA Adaptive Sync; Annet
ja: アダプティブシンク技術: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; なし; VESA Adaptive Sync; その他
en: Adaptive sync technology: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; None; VESA Adaptive Sync; Other
tr: Uyarlanabilir senkronizasyon teknolojisi: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Uyumlu; Hiçbiri; VESA Adaptive Sync; Diğer
de: Adaptive Synchronisationstechnologie: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync kompatibel; Keine; VESA Adaptive Sync; Sonstiges
th: เทคโนโลยีการซิงค์แบบปรับตัว: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; ไม่มี; VESA Adaptive Sync; อื่นๆ
fr: Technologie de synchronisation adaptative: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; Aucune; VESA Adaptive Sync; Autre
nl: Adaptieve synchronisatietechnologie: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync-compatibel; Geen; VESA Adaptive Sync; Andere
zh-CN: 自适应同步技术: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync 兼容; 无; VESA 自适应同步; 其他
it: Tecnologia di sincronizzazione adattiva: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; Nessuna; VESA Adaptive Sync; Altro
sk-SK: Technológia adaptívnej synchronizácie: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync kompatibilný; Žiadny; VESA Adaptive Sync; Iné
el: Τεχνολογία προσαρμοστικού συγχρονισμού: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync Compatible; Καμία; VESA Adaptive Sync; Άλλο
da: Adaptiv synkroniseringsteknologi: AMD FreeSync; AMD FreeSync Premium; AMD FreeSync Premium Pro; NVIDIA G-Sync; NVIDIA G-Sync-kompatibel; Ingen; VESA Adaptive Sync; Andet